Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1461.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XX-NCAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATIONINVESTMENT INCENTIVE PROGRAMSection 2001-N. Scope of article.This article relates to the Career and Technical Education Investment Incentive Program.Section 2002-N. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 1234567891011121314151617181920 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicable tax." The liability for taxes imposed under Articles III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX, XV or XX of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 or a tax under Article XVI of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921. The term shall not include a tax withheld by an employer from an employee under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Area career and technical education school." A specialized public secondary school established under subdivision (c) of Article XVIII which is used exclusively or principally for the provision of career and technical education programs to individuals preparing to enter the labor market or pursue postsecondary education."Business firm." An entity authorized to do business in this Commonwealth and subject to taxes imposed under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX, XV or XX of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 or a tax under Article XVI of The Insurance Company Law of 1921. The term includes a pass-through entity, including a pass-through entity whose purpose is the making of contributions under this article and whose shareholders, partners or members are composed of owners or employees of other business firms."Career and technical education partnership organization." A nonprofit entity which meets all of the following:(1) Is exempt from Federal taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.).(2) Provides support or expands access to career and technical education programs.(3) Contributes based on one of the following:20250HB1461PN1721 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) At least 80% of its annual cash receipts as contributions to a participating school for program- related costs. For purposes of this subparagraph, a nonprofit entity "contributes" its annual cash receipts when it expends or otherwise irrevocably encumbers those funds for expenditure during the then-current fiscal year of the nonprofit entity or during the next succeeding fiscal year of the nonprofit entity. A nonprofit entity shall also include a school district foundation, public school foundation, charter school foundation or area career and technical education school foundation.(ii) At least 80% of its annual cash receipts to an enrollment expansion program. For purposes of this subparagraph, a nonprofit entity "contributes" its annual cash receipts to an enrollment expansion program when it expends or otherwise irrevocably encumbers those funds for distribution during the then-current fiscal year of the nonprofit entity or during the next succeeding fiscal year of the nonprofit entity.(iii) At least 80% of its annual cash receipts to a combination of expenditures under subparagraphs (i) and (ii)."Career and technical education program." Any of the following:(1) A vocational education program approved by the Department of Education under 22 Pa. Code Ch. 339 (relating to vocational education).(2) A program that provides educational activities which meet all of the following:(i) Offer a sequence of courses that:20250HB1461PN1721 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide individuals with content aligned with academic standards and technical knowledge and skills needed to prepare for further education and careers in a high-priority occupation.(B) Provide technical skill proficiency, an industry-recognized credential or a certificate. (ii) Include competency-based applied learning that contributes to the academic knowledge, higher-order reasoning and problem-solving skills, work attitudes, general employability skills, technical skills, occupation-specific skills and knowledge of all aspects of an industry, including entrepreneurship, of an individual."Charter school." As defined in section 1703-A."Contribution." The donation of any of the following:(1) Cash to a career and technical education partnership organization to be used to pay program-related costs.(2) Cash to a career and technical education partnership organization to be used for an enrollment expansion program.(3) Personal property, including equipment and supplies, as approved by the participating school.(4) Services, the value of which is the net cost of the donation to the donor or the pro rata hourly wage, including benefits, of the individual performing the service, as approved by the participating school."Cyber charter school." As defined in section 1703-A."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Eligible student." An individual who:(1) Is of school age, as defined in section 2002-B.20250HB1461PN1721 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Is enrolled in a school entity.(3) Intends to enroll in an age-appropriate career and technical education program.(4) Is a current resident of this Commonwealth."Enrollment expansion program." A program established to pay the costs associated with increasing the enrollment of eligible students in a career and technical education program at participating schools."High-priority occupation." A profession that:(1) is high-wage and high-skill for which there is excess employer demand as identified in the Department of Labor and Industry's current year's high-priority or in-demand occupations list or the State System of Higher Education's workforce needs assessment ; or (2) requires a credential, certification, licensing, postsecondary training, associate's degree, bachelor's degree, master's degree or doctoral or first professional degree."Participating school." A public school, area career and technical education school, charter school or regional charter school that chooses to participate in the program."Pass-through entity." A partnership as defined in section 301(n.0) of the Tax Reform Code of 1971, a single-member limited liability company treated as a disregarded entity for Federal income tax purposes or a Pennsylvania S corporation as defined in section 301(n.1) of the Tax Reform Code of 1971. The term includes a pass-through entity that owns an interest in a pass-through entity."Program." The Career and Technical Education Investment Incentive Program established under this article.20250HB1461PN1721 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Program-related costs." Cost and fees for rental or purchase of equipment, materials or supplies used in instructing a career and technical education program at a participating school."Public school." A public elementary school or a public secondary school at which a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and which meets the applicable requirements of 42 U.S.C. Ch. 21 Subch. VI (relating to equal employment opportunities)."Regional charter school." As defined in section 1703-A."School entity." A public school, area career and technical education school, charter school, regional charter school or cyber charter school."Secondary school." A school with an eleventh grade."Tax Reform Code of 1971." The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 2003-N. Declaration of policy.The Commonwealth recognizes that businesses need educated and trained workers. It is the intent of the General Assembly to foster and encourage private investment in career and technical education programs and the repair, upkeep, replacement and upgrading of industry-grade materials and instructional equipment. Furthermore, it is the intent of the General Assembly that private investment will open doors of opportunity for students and enable them to develop the knowledge and skills for high-demand careers under this article.Section 2004-N. School participation in program.(a) Election to participate.--By October 1, 2025, and each January 1 thereafter, a school entity other than a cyber charter 20250HB1461PN1721 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school may elect to participate in the program under this article for the following school year.(b) Notice.--A school entity that elects to participate under subsection (a) shall notify the department of the intent to participate on a form developed by the department. The notice under this subsection shall specify all of the following:(1) That the school entity intends to be a participating school.(2) The amount of program-related costs attributable to each eligible student. The amount under this paragraph shall not exceed the amount that would have been attributed to a student outside of the enrollment expansion program.(c) Participating school responsibilities.--The following responsibilities shall apply to a participating school:(1) Prior to enrollment of a student, a participating school shall inform the parent of a student of the rules, policies and procedures of the participating school, including any academic policies, disciplinary rules or administrative procedures. Enrollment of a student in a participating school shall constitute acceptance of any rules, policies or procedures of the participating school.(2) A participating school may enroll an eligible student in a career and technical education program until the participating school's available seats are filled.Section 2005-N. Establishment and qualification by organizations.(a) Qualification.--(1) In order to qualify for contributions under this article, a career and technical education partnership organization must certify to the department that the 20250HB1461PN1721 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organization is eligible to participate in the program.(2) A career and technical education partnership organization must agree to annually report by October 1, 2025 , and each September 1 thereafter, on a form provided by the department, the following information:(i) The organization is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.).(ii) The total number of eligible students and the total amount of contributions awarded per participating school during the immediately preceding school year through an enrollment expansion program.(iii) Where the career and technical education partnership organization collects information on a county-by-county basis, the total number of eligible students and the total amount of contributions awarded during the immediately preceding school year through an enrollment expansion program to residents of each county.(iv) The names and descriptions of career and technical education programs and the total amount of the contributions made to those programs during the immediately preceding school year.(v) The name of each participating school that works with businesses that offer internships, apprenticeships and mentoring programs.(vi) The name of each participating school where career and technical education programs that received contributions were implemented as a result of the contribution during the immediately preceding school year.20250HB1461PN1721 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) Where the career and technical education partnership organization collects information on a county-by-county basis, the total number and the total amount of contributions made during the immediately preceding school year for career and technical education programs at participating schools in each county in which the contributions were made.(viii) The number of credentials earned, including, but not limited to, a certificate, industry certification or State license, and the industry or occupation to which the credential is linked to this program during the immediately preceding school year.(ix) The number of students employed in high-priority occupations as a result of participating in the program.(x) The number of students who secured internships or apprenticeships for high-priority occupations.(xi) The organization's Federal Form 990 or other Federal or State form indicating the tax status of the organization for Federal and State tax purposes, if any, and a copy of a compilation, review or audit of the organization's financial statements conducted by a certified public accounting firm, including an itemized list of expenditures.(3) A career and technical education partnership organization shall provide information under paragraph (2) to the best of the career and technical education partnership organization's ability.(4) The department shall provide forms to interested career and technical education partnership organizations and 20250HB1461PN1721 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall post the forms on its publicly accessible Internet website.(5) The department may not require any other information to be provided by career and technical education partnership organizations, except as expressly authorized under this article.(6) A career and technical education partnership organization that does not meet the certification requirements of this article shall not be eligible to participate in the program.(b) Publication.--The department shall post and update as necessary a list of each career and technical education partnership organization qualified under this section on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2006-N. Contributions.(a) Designation of contribution.--A contribution made by a business firm under this article shall be designated for:(1) an enrollment expansion program; or(2) program-related costs in a career and technical education program.(b) Use of cash contributions.--A participating school shall keep all cash contributions received under this article in a restricted account which shall only be used for program-related costs and enrollment expansion programs.Section 2007-N. Tax credit.(a) Application.--A business firm may apply to the department for a tax credit certificate for contributions made to a career and technical education partnership organization under section 2006 -N. A business firm that receives a tax credit under this article shall be subject to the limitations in this 20250HB1461PN1721 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section and section 2008 -N. (b) Time of application for credits.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), the department may accept applications for tax credits available during fiscal year 2023-2024 no earlier than January 1, 2025, and for tax credits available each fiscal year thereafter no earlier than July 1.(2) The application of a business firm for tax credits available during a fiscal year as part of the second year of a two-year commitment or as a renewal of a two-year commitment which was fulfilled in the previous fiscal year may be accepted no earlier than May 15 preceding the fiscal year.(c) Tax credit.--The Department of Revenue shall on a first-come, first-served basis grant a tax credit against an applicable tax to a business firm providing proof of a contribution to a career and technical education partnership organization in the taxable year in which the contribution is made in accordance with the following:(1) The tax credit shall not exceed 75% of the total amount contributed during the taxable year by the business firm.(2) Except as provided under subsection (h) , the tax credit may not exceed $750,000 annually per business firm for contributions made to career and technical partnership organizations.(d) Priority.--Priority for a tax credit certificate under subsection (c) shall be given to:(1) A business firm that did not receive a tax credit under Article XX-B in the prior fiscal year.20250HB1461PN1721 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A business firm that makes a contribution to a career and technical education partnership organization located in the business firm's workforce development area as described in the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128, 128 Stat. 1425).(e) Additional amount.--Subject to the limitations of section 2008-N, and in accordance with this section, the department shall grant a tax credit certificate of up to 90% of the total amount contributed during the taxable year if the business firm demonstrates a written commitment to provide the career and technical education partnership organization with the same amount for at least two consecutive tax years at the time of application.(f) Approval of tax credits.--Unless all authorized tax credits have already been awarded, the department shall give written notice of its approval to each business firm that submits a completed application within 30 days following the date postmarked on the envelope of the completed application.(g) Waiting list.--The department shall maintain a waiting list of each business firm whose application has not been approved because all available tax credits have been awarded, and shall notify a business firm that is not awarded a tax credit due to a lack of available tax credits that the business firm is placed on the waiting list. When a tax credit becomes available, the department shall award the tax credit to the business firms in the order in which the business firms were placed on the waiting list.(h) Temporary increase in maximum tax credits available.-- (1) If all tax credits authorized under this section for contributions to career and technical education partnership 20250HB1461PN1721 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organizations have not been awarded as of October 1 of a fiscal year, the limitations specified in subsection (c) shall not apply. The following shall apply:(i) The department may accept applications from October 1 through November 30 from a business firm, including a business firm that already applied for the maximum tax credits available under subsections (a) and (e).(ii) Tax credits awarded under this subsection shall not exceed 75% of the total amount contributed during the taxable year by a business firm pursuant to an application filed under this subsection.(iii) The provisions of subsection (b) shall not apply to applications for tax credits made under this subsection.(2) The tax credits awarded under this subsection shall be awarded on a first-come, first-served basis.(i) Timing of contribution.--A contribution by a business firm to a career and technical education partnership organization shall be made no later than 30 days following the approval of an application under subsection (a).Section 2008-N. Limitations.(a) Amount.--(1) The total aggregate amount of all tax credits approved for contributions from business firms to career and technical education partnership organizations may not exceed $15,000,000 in a fiscal year. (2) No more than 10% of the total aggregate amount of tax credits under this subsection shall be distributed to a business making a contribution to be used for an enrollment 20250HB1461PN1721 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expansion program.(3) No less than 90% of the total aggregate amount of tax credits under this subsection shall be distributed to a business making a contribution to pay program-related costs and for services and personal property contributions.(b) Activities.--The department may not approve a tax credit for activities that are a part of a business firm's normal course of business.(c) Tax liability.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a tax credit granted for a taxable year may not exceed the tax liability of a business firm.(2) In the case of a credit granted to a pass-through entity which elects to distribute the tax credit under this article, a tax credit granted for a taxable year and distributed to a shareholder, member or partner may not exceed the tax liability of the shareholder, member or partner.(d) Use.--A tax credit not used by the applicant in the taxable year the contribution was made or in the year designated by the shareholder, member or partner to whom the credit was transferred under this article may not be carried forward or carried back and is not refundable or transferable.Section 2009-N. Notice of participating schools.By November l, 2023, and each February 1 thereafter, the department shall provide all career and technical education partnership organizations with a list of each participating school in this Commonwealth located within each county.Section 2010-N. Guidelines.Within 45 days of the effective date of this section, in 20250HB1461PN1721 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consultation with the Department of Education, Department of Revenue and the Department of Labor and Industry, the department shall develop guidelines to implement the program.Section 2011-N. Annual report to General Assembly.(a) Submittal.--(1) No later than December 1, 2026 , and each December 1 thereafter, the Secretary of Community and Economic Development shall submit a report to the General Assembly summarizing the impact of the program provided under this article. The department shall post the report on its publicly accessible Internet website.(2) The report shall be submitted to all of the following:(i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate.(iv) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Contents.--The report shall include the following information:(1) The amount of tax credits claimed for contributions to a career and technical education partnership organization during the fiscal year.(2) The total cash, personal property and service contributions made from business firms to career and technical education partnership organizations.(3) A list of all career and technical education 20250HB1461PN1721 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 partnership organizations receiving contributions from a business firm granted a tax credit under this article.(4) The number of high-priority industries participating in the program.(5) The regional disbursement of tax credits. (6) Other data points deemed relevant or necessary by the department administering the program.(c) Provision of information.--The department shall provide information under subsection (b) to the best of the department's ability.Section 2. Within 10 days of the development of the guidelines under section 2010-N of the act, the Department of Community and Economic Development shall transmit notice of the development of the guidelines to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 3. The addition of Article XX-N of the act shall apply to taxable years commencing after December 31, 2025.Section 4. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:The addition of sections 2001-N, 2002-N and 2010-N of the act.Section 2 of this act.Section 3 of this act.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately upon publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin of the notice under section 2 of this act.20250HB1461PN1721 - 16 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728